fr: Base à la crème fouettée: Amande; Noix de cajou; Noix de coco; Crème laitière; Mélange végétal; Avoine; Riz; Soja; Mélange de graisses végétales; Autre
ru: Основа взбитых сливок: Миндальная; Кешью; Кокосовая; Молочные сливки; Смешанная растительная; Овсяная; Рисовая; Соевая; Смесь растительных жиров; Другое
ko: 휘핑크림 베이스: 아몬드; 캐슈너트; 코코넛; 유크림; 식물성 혼합; 귀리; 쌀; 대두; 식물성 지방 혼합; 기타
pt-PT: Base do chantilly: Amêndoa; Caju; Coco; Natas de origem animal; Mistura de origem vegetal; Aveia; Arroz; Soja; Mistura de gorduras vegetais; Outro
zh-CN: 奶油霜基底: 扁桃仁; 腰果; 椰子; 乳脂奶油; 混合植物基; 燕麦; 大米; 大豆; 混合植物脂肪; 其他
tr: Krem şanti baz bileşeni: Badem; Kaju; Hindistan cevizi; Süt kreması; Karışık bitki bazlı; Yulaf; Pirinç; Soya; Bitkisel yağ karışımı; Diğer
bg-BG: Основа за бита сметана: Бадем; Кашу; Кокос; Млечна сметана; Смес на растителна основа; Овес; Ориз; Соя; Смес от растителни мазнини; Друго
pl: Baza bitej śmietany: Migdałowa; Z orzechów nerkowca; Kokosowa; Śmietanka mleczna; Mieszanka roślinna; Owsiana; Ryżowa; Sojowa; Mieszanka tłuszczów roślinnych; Inne
da: Basisingrediens i flødeskum: Mandel; Cashew; Kokos; Fløde af komælk; Blandet plantebaseret; Havre; Ris; Soja; Blanding af vegetabilsk fedt; Andet
it: Base di panna montata: Mandorla; Anacardi; Cocco; Panna da latte; Misto vegetale; Avena; Riso; Soia; Misto di grassi vegetali; Altro
sv: Bas för vispad grädde: Mandel; Cashew; Kokos; Mjölkbaserad grädde; Blandad växtbaserad; Havre; Ris; Soja; Vegetabilisk fettblandning; Övrigt
cs: Základ šlehačky: Mandlový; Kešu; Kokosový; Mléčná smetana; Směs rostlinných bází; Ovesný; Rýžový; Sójový; Směs rostlinných tuků; Jiný
sl-SI: Osnova za stepeno smetano: Mandelj; Indijski orešček; Kokos; Mlečna smetana; Mešanica na rastlinski osnovi; Oves; Riž; Soja; Mešanica rastlinskih maščob; Drugo
zh-TW: 鮮奶油基底: 杏仁; 腰果; 椰子; 乳製品鮮奶油; 混合植物性; 燕麥; 米; 大豆; 混合植物脂; 其他
hr-HR: Baza tučenog vrhnja: Badem; Indijski orah; Kokos; Mliječno vrhnje; Mješavina biljnog podrijetla; Zob; Riža; Soja; Mješavina biljnih masti; Ostalo
lt-LT: Plaktos grietinėlės pagrindas: Migdolų; Anakardžių; Kokosų; Pieno grietinėlė; Mišri augalinė; Avižų; Ryžių; Sojų; Augalinių riebalų mišinys; Kita
vi: Thành phần nền của kem tươi: Hạnh nhân; Hạt điều; Dừa; Kem sữa bò; Gốc thực vật hỗn hợp; Yến mạch; Gạo; Đậu nành; Hỗn hợp chất béo thực vật; Khác
pt-BR: Base do creme chantilly: Amêndoa; Castanha-de-caju; Coco; Creme de leite; Misto à base de plantas; Aveia; Arroz; Soja; Mistura de gordura vegetal; Outra
en: Whipped cream base: Almond; Cashew; Coconut; Dairy cream; Mixed plant-based; Oat; Rice; Soy; Vegetable fat blend; Other
nb: Basismateriale i pisket krem: Mandel; Cashew; Kokos; Fløte; Blandet plantebasert; Havre; Ris; Soya; Vegetabilsk fettblanding; Annet
es: Base de crema batida: Almendra; Anacardo; Coco; Crema láctea; Mezcla de origen vegetal; Avena; Arroz; Soya; Mezcla de grasas vegetales; Otro
sk-SK: Šľahačkový základ: Mandľový; Kešu; Kokosový; Mliečna smotana; Zmes rastlinného pôvodu; Ovsený; Ryžový; Sójový; Zmes rastlinných tukov; Iné
fi: Kermavaahdon perusainesosa: Manteli; Cashew; Kookos; Maitokerma; Kasvipohjainen sekoite; Kaura; Riisi; Soija; Kasvirasvasekoite; Muu
el: Βάση σαντιγί: Αμύγδαλο; Κάσιους; Καρύδα; Κρέμα γάλακτος (ζωική); Μικτή φυτικής προέλευσης; Βρώμη; Ρύζι; Σόγια; Μείγμα φυτικών λιπαρών; Άλλο
ja: ホイップクリームベース: アーモンド; カシューナッツ; ココナッツ; 乳脂肪クリーム; ミックスプラントベース; オーツ; ライス; 大豆; 植物性脂肪ブレンド; その他
ro-RO: Bază pentru frișcă: Migdale; Caju; Nucă de cocos; Frișcă din lapte; Amestec vegetal; Ovăz; Orez; Soia; Amestec de grăsimi vegetale; Altele
hu: Tejszínhab alapja: Mandula; Kesudió; Kókusz; Tejhab / Tejszín; Növényi alapú keverék; Zab; Rizs; Szója; Növényi zsiradék keverék; Egyéb
nl: Basisingrediënt slagroom: Amandel; Cashew; Kokos; Zuivelroom; Gemengd plantaardig; Haver; Rijst; Soja; Plantaardig vetmengsel; Overig
th: ฐานวิปครีม: อัลมอนด์; เม็ดมะม่วงหิมพานต์; มะพร้าว; ครีมจากนม; แพลนต์เบสผสม; ข้าวโอ๊ต; ข้าว; ถั่วเหลือง; ไขมันพืชผสม; อื่นๆ
de: Grundzutat der Sprühsahne: Mandel; Cashew; Kokosnuss; Sahne; Pflanzlich gemischt; Hafer; Reis; Soja; Pflanzenfettmischung; Andere